Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,159
Nail technology home services permit.

A licensed nail technology salon may employ licensed nail technicians to perform nail technology home services by meeting the following requirements:

(1) In order to be issued a nail technology home services permit by the department, an applicant shall hold a current active cosmetology salon license or nail technology salon license; and

(2) Any person seeking a nail technology home services permit shall submit a complete application at least ten days before the proposed date for beginning home services. Along with the application the applicant shall submit evidence of application for liability insurance or bonding.

The department shall issue a nail technology home services permit to each applicant meeting the requirements set forth in this section.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 79;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,230;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 421.